Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska90-403
Eugene T. Mahoney State Park.

The land acquired by the Game and Parks Commission located in township 12 north, range 10 east of the sixth principal meridian, Cass County, is hereby named the Eugene T. Mahoney State Park.

Laws 1985, LB 606A, § 1.